Vermont statutes. TITLE 3A Executive Orders
Chapter 20. Internal Security and Public Safety
Executive Order No. 20-59
(No. 01-20) [Declaration of State of Emergency in Response to COVID-19 and National Guard Call-Out.

WHEREAS, since December 2019, Vermont has been working in close collaboration with the national Centers for Disease Control and Prevention (CDC) and with the United States Health and Human Services Agency to monitor and plan for the potential for an outbreak
of respiratory illness due to a novel coronavirus (a disease now known as COVID-19), in the United States; and

WHEREAS, this rapidly evolving global situation required the Governor to direct the Vermont Department of Health (VDH) to activate the Health Operations Center in February 2020 when VDH began to monitor and later, test Vermonters who may have been exposed
to COVID-19; and

WHEREAS, in March 2020, the Governor directed Vermont Emergency Management (VEM) to assemble an interagency taskforce, and later to activate the Vermont State Emergency Operations Center (SEOC), in accordance with the State Emergency Management Plan,
to organize prevention, response, and mitigation efforts and share information with local and state officials; and

WHEREAS, on March 7, 2020 and March 11, 2020, VDH detected the first two cases of COVID-19 in Vermont; and

WHEREAS, on March 11, 2020 the World Health Organization made the assessment that COVID-19 can be characterized as a pandemic; and

WHEREAS, we now know that while most individuals affected by COVID-19 will experience mild flu-like symptoms, some individuals, especially those who are elderly or already have severe underlying chronic health conditions will have more serious symptoms
and require hospitalization; and

WHEREAS, both travel-related cases and community contact transmission of COVID-19 have been detected in the region and this transmission is expected to continue; and

WHEREAS, if no mitigation steps are taken, COVID-19 would likely spread in Vermont at a rate similar to the rate of spread in other states and countries, and the number of persons requiring medical care could exceed locally available resources; and

WHEREAS, it is critical we take steps to control outbreaks of COVID-19, particularly among those who are elderly or already have underlying chronic health conditions, to minimize the risk to the public, maintain the health and safety of Vermonters, and
limit the spread of infection in our communities and within our healthcare facilities; and

WHEREAS, Vermonters must come together as we have before in a crisis, to do our part to protect the very ill and elderly by preventing and slowing the spread of this virus and ensure those who experience the most severe symptoms have access to the care
they need.

NOW THEREFORE, I, Philip B. Scott, by virtue of the authority vested in me as Governor of Vermont and Commander-in-Chief, Vermont National Guard, by the Constitution of the State of Vermont, Chapter II, Section 20 and under

20 V.S.A. §§ 8
, 9 and 11 and Chapter 29, hereby declare a State of Emergency for the State of Vermont.

IT IS HEREBY ORDERED:

All State licensed nursing homes (as defined in

33 V.S.A. § 7102(7)
), the Vermont Psychiatric Care Hospital (VPCH) and Middlesex Therapeutic Community Residence shall prohibit visitor access to reduce facility-based transmission. This prohibition shall not apply to medically necessary
personnel or visitors for residents receiving end of life care. Any visitors will be screened in accordance with recommendations by the Commissioner of the Vermont Department of Health.

All State licensed assisted living residences (as defined in

33 V.S.A. § 7102(1)
), Level III residential care homes (33 V.S.A. 7102(10)(A)), and intermediate care facilities for individuals with intellectual disability (ICF/ID) (42 C.F.R. § 440.150), shall prohibit visitor access to reduce facility-based
transmission. This prohibition shall not apply to two designated visitors, medically necessary personnel or visitors for residents receiving end of life care. Any visitors will be screened in accordance with recommendations by
the Commissioner of the Vermont Department of Health.

All State therapeutic community residences (as defined in

33 V.S.A. § 7102(11)
), and Level IV residential care homes (

33 V.S.A. § 7102(10)(B)
), shall restrict visitor access as necessary to reduce facility-based transmission. This restriction shall not apply to medically necessary personnel or visitors for residents receiving end of life care. Any visitors
will be screened in accordance with recommendations by the Commissioner of the Vermont Department of Health.

A “non-essential gathering” does not include normal operations at airports, bus or railway stations where persons may be in transit; typical office, construction, manufacturing, grocery, food production, retail and retail banking, professional or other
employment environments; gatherings of the press; or operations of the Vermont Judiciary or General Assembly consistent with their constitutional authority. Questions from commercial entities, employers, event sponsors and
others shall be directed to the SEOC which shall provide appropriate guidance.

All hospitals (as defined in

18 V.S.A. § 1902
), except VPCH, shall develop visitation policies and procedures that conform to a minimum standard which shall be developed by the Agency of Human Services to restrict visitor access to reduce facility-based transmission.

In order to limit exposure and protect state employees, all non-essential out-of-state travel by State employees for State business is hereby suspended. The Secretary of Administration shall, in consultation with the Commissioner of Health, develop guidance
for employees returning from out-of-state travel. The Secretary of Administration shall also, in consultation with the Commissioner of Human Resources, encourage and facilitate telework among those State employees with the capacity
to work remotely.

To help preserve and maintain public health, I hereby prohibit all large non-essential mass gatherings of more than 250 people in a single room or single space at the same time for social and recreational activities, such as an auditorium, stadium, arena,
large conference room, meeting hall, cafeteria, theater, or any other confined indoor or confined outdoor space.

A “non-essential mass gathering” does not “

not
include normal operations at airports, bus or railway stations where 250 or more persons may be in transit. It also does not include typical office environments or retail or grocery stores where large numbers
of people are present, but where it is unusual for them to be within arm’s length of one another. Questions from commercial recreational entities, event sponsors and others shall be directed to the SEOC which shall provide
appropriate guidance.

In preparing for and responding to COVID-19, all agencies of the state shall use and employ state personnel, equipment, and facilities or perform any and all activities consistent with the direction of VDH and the Department of Public Safety (DPS)/VEM
in accordance with the State Emergency Management Plan.

I hereby authorize and direct the Adjutant General to call into Active State Service, for the purpose of assisting and supporting the State of Vermont, in its efforts to respond to the conditions created or caused by COVID-19 in order to alleviate hardship
and suffering of citizens and communities and in order to preserve the lives and property of the State, any and all units of the National Guard of the State of Vermont as he, in consultation with DPS/VEM, may deem appropriate to
carry out the purposes of this Order.

The Department of Financial Regulation shall, in consultation with the Departments of Labor, Tax, and Finance and Management, collect data on the state’s demographics and analyze the potential and actual impacts of a COVID-19 outbreak on the state’s population,
the labor force and the economy, including state revenues.

In order to limit the spread of COVID-19 through community contacts, DPS shall, in consultation with VDH, coordinate the allocation of statewide investigatory resources to enhance VDH capacity for contact tracing.

The Commissioner of Motor Vehicles is hereby directed to develop a plan to extend DMV licensing and registration renewal deadlines and other statutory and regulatory DMV requirements to mitigate contagion risk by reducing customer traffic throughout all
DMV district offices.

While many are concerned about the welfare of their children in the pre-K-through-12 schools, suspension of school at this time is not recommended by the Commissioner of Health as of the date of this Order. The Secretary of Education is hereby directed
to develop a contingency plan for school closings necessitated by COVID-19 for such time as this may be recommended by VDH and VEM.

I hereby direct that no school superintendent or school board shall cause a student or parent to be penalized for student absences that are the result of following medical advice or the guidance of VDH or arising from the concerns of parents or guardians
relating to COVID-19.

The Commissioner of Health shall oversee the investigation, coordination and mitigation efforts for the duration of this Order. All local boards of health shall consult with and abide by the recommendations of the Commissioner of Health prior to taking
any action regarding isolation or quarantine of an individual(s). Town health officers shall work with and assist the Department as directed by the Commissioner of Health.

Relevant rules governing medical services shall be suspended to the extent necessary to permit such personnel to provide paramedicine, transportation to destinations including hospitals and places other than hospitals or health care facilities, telemedicine
to facilitate treatment of patients in place, and such other services as may be approved by the Commissioner of Health.

Relevant rules governing nursing services shall be suspended to the extent necessary to permit such personnel to provide medical care, including but not limited to administration of medicine, prescribing of medication, telemedicine to facilitate treatment
of patients in place, and such other services as may be approved by the Secretary of State in consultation with the Commissioner of Health.

The Agency of Commerce and Community Development shall work with U.S. Small Business Administration (SBA) and Vermont Small Business Development Center (SBDC) to survey businesses to determine the economic impact of losses for the disaster period as compared
to the same period of the preceding year for the purpose of applying to the U.S. Small Business Administration (SBA) for SBA Economic Injury Disaster Loans.

To ensure that workers affected by COVID-19 have access to wage replacement programs, I hereby direct the Department of Labor to extend unemployment insurance to those Vermonters following the instructions of their healthcare providers to self-isolate
or quarantine; to remove the work search requirement for those workers affected by temporary closure of a business; and to temporarily suspend any mechanisms that would delay the release of funds to claimants. Further, I hereby
direct the Commissioner of Labor to work with the Legislature on other opportunities to extend benefits to workers affected by COVID-19.

Pursuant to the powers granted to the Governor in

20 V.S.A. §§ 8
, 9 and 11 and other provisions of law, I shall from time to time issue recommendations, directives and orders as circumstances may require.

This Executive Order shall take effect upon signing and shall continue in full force and effect until April 15, 2020, at which time the Governor, in consultation with VDH and DPS/VEM, shall assess the emergency and determine whether to amend or extend
this Order.

ADDENDUM 1 TO EXECUTIVE ORDER 01-20

WHEREAS, on Friday, March 13, 2020, the Governor issued Executive Order 01-20, Declaration of State of Emergency in Response to COVID-19 and National Guard Call-Out (“Executive Order”), declaring a state of emergency for the State of Vermont in response
to COVID-19; and

WHEREAS, since that time, additional cases of COVID-19 have been tested as presumptively positive in the State; and

WHEREAS, the Governor has determined, in consultation with the Commissioner of Health and the Department of Public Safety/Division of Vermont Emergency Management, to amend the Executive Order to further restrict the size of mass gatherings to the

lesser
of fifty (50) people or fifty percent (50%) of the occupancy of a facility; and

WHEREAS, this decision is based on the best scientific evidence available to the experts at the Vermont Department of Health in the interest of furthering “social distancing” and is expected to help prevent and reduce the spread of COVID-19.

NOW THEREFORE, I, Philip B. Scott, by virtue of the authority vested in me as Governor of Vermont by the Constitution of the State of Vermont, the emergency powers set forth in

20 V.S.A. §§ 8
, 9 and 11 and other laws, hereby amend and restate Section 6 of the Executive Order to further restrict the size of “mass gatherings,” as follows:

6.
To help preserve and maintain public health, I hereby prohibit all non-essential mass gatherings to the

lesser
of fifty (50) people or fifty percent (50%) of the occupancy of a facility at the same time for social, recreational or entertainment activities, such as an auditorium, stadium, arena, large conference room,
meeting hall, cafeteria, theater, bar, restaurant, gym or any other confined indoor or confined outdoor space.

A “non-essential mass gathering” does

not
include normal operations at airports, bus or railway stations where persons may be in transit. It also does not include typical office environments or retail or grocery stores where large numbers of people
are present, but where it is unusual for them to be within arm’s length of one another. Questions from commercial entities, event sponsors and others shall be directed to the SEOC which shall provide appropriate guidance.

Dated March 16, 2020

ADDENDUM 2 TO EXECUTIVE ORDER NO. 01-20

ORDER PROHIBITING GATHERINGS OF 50 PEOPLE OR 50% OF PERMITTED OCCUPANCY, WHICHEVER IS LESS, AND ON-PREMISES CONSUMPTION OF FOOD AND DRINK

WHEREAS, on Friday, March 13, 2020, the Governor issued Executive Order 01-20, Declaration of State of Emergency in Response to COVID-19 and National Guard Call-Out (“Executive Order”), declaring a state of emergency for the State of Vermont in response
to COVID-19; and

WHEREAS, since that time, additional cases of COVID-19 have been tested as presumptively positive in the State; and

WHEREAS, after receiving updated recommendations from the CDC, social distancing and mitigation efforts recommended by the Vermont Department of Health, and in consultation with neighboring states for a regional approach, the Governor has determined it
is necessary to close all bars and restaurants statewide through April 6, 2020, although food service establishments may continue to offer takeout and delivery service; and

WHEREAS, it is important for all Vermonters to recognize additional reductions or prohibitions may be implemented as needed to the extent there is a growing trend of confirmed COVID-19 in Vermont.

NOW THEREFORE, I, Philip B. Scott, by virtue of the authority vested in me as Governor of Vermont by the Constitution of the State of Vermont, the emergency powers set forth in 20 V.S.A. §§ 8, 9 and 11 and other laws, hereby amend and restate Section
6 of the Executive Order to further restrict the size of “mass gatherings,” and prohibit on-premises consumption of food or drink as follows:

6.
To help preserve and maintain public health, except as set forth below, I hereby prohibit all non-essential mass gatherings of fifty (50) people or fifty percent (50%) of the occupancy of a facility, whichever
is less, at the same time for social, recreational or entertainment activities, such as an auditorium, stadium, arena, large conference room, meeting hall, theater, gymnasium, fitness center, library or any other confined indoor
or confined outdoor space.

A “non-essential mass gathering” does

not
include normal operations at airports, bus or railway stations where persons may be in transit. It also does not include typical office environments or retail or grocery stores where large numbers of people
are present, but where it is unusual for them to be within arm’s length of one another. Questions from commercial entities, event sponsors and others shall be directed to the SEOC which shall provide appropriate guidance.

Effective Tuesday, March 17, 2020 at 2:00 p.m. and continuing in full force and effect until April 6, 2020, any restaurant, bar, or establishment that offers food or drink shall not permit on-premises consumption of food or drink; provided however, such
establishments may continue to offer food for take-out and by delivery. On or before April 6, 2020, the Governor, in consultation with the Vermont Department of Health and the Department of Public Safety/Division of Emergency
Management shall assess the emergency and determine whether to amend or extend this Order as it relates to restaurants, bars, or establishments that offer food or drink.

Dated: March 16, 2020

ADDENDUM 3 TO EXECUTIVE ORDER NO. 01-20

Suspension of all Non-Essential Adult Elective Surgery and Medical and Surgical Procedures

WHEREAS, on Friday, March 13, 2020, the Governor issued Executive Order 01-20, Declaration of State of Emergency in Response to COVID-19 and National Guard Call-Out (“Executive Order”), declaring a state of emergency for the State of Vermont in response
to COVID-19; and

WHEREAS, since that time, additional cases of COVID-19 have been tested as presumptively positive in the State; and

WHEREAS, the Executive Order expressly recognized the critical need to take steps to control outbreaks of COVID-19, particularly among those who are elderly or already have underlying chronic health conditions, to minimize the risk to the public, maintain
the health and safety of Vermonters, and limit the spread of infection in our communities and within our healthcare facilities; and

WHEREAS, in consultation with the Commissioner of the Department of Health, the Governor has directed a number of mitigation strategies for the State in order to protect individuals at risk for severe illness; and

WHEREAS, to aggressively address COVID-19, conservation of critical resources such as ventilators and Personal Protective Equipment (PPE) is essential, as well as limiting exposure of patients and staff to COVID-19; and

WHEREAS, after receiving updated recommendations from the U.S. Surgeon General and the U.S. College of Surgeons, the Centers for Medicare & Medicaid, and in consultation with the Commissioner of the Department of Health and the Vermont Association
of Hospitals and Health Systems, the Governor has determined it is necessary to suspend all non-essential adult elective surgery and medical and surgical procedures, including all dental procedures; and

WHEREAS, the suspension of all non-essential adult elective surgery and medical and surgical procedures, including all dental procedures will be critical in helping to protect patients, reduce exposure to healthcare providers and preserve critical personal
protective equipment (PPE), which is in critical demand around the country; and

WHEREAS, it is important for all Vermonters to recognize additional reductions or prohibitions may be implemented as needed to the extent there is a growing trend of confirmed COVID-19 in Vermont.

NOW THEREFORE, I, Philip B. Scott, by virtue of the authority vested in me as Governor of Vermont by the Constitution of the State of Vermont, the emergency powers set forth in 20 V.S.A. §§ 8, 9 and 11 and other laws, hereby order all clinicians in Vermont
to expedite postponement of all non-essential adult elective surgery and medical and surgical procedures, including all dental procedures in the safest but most expedient way possible.

At all times, the supply of personal protective equipment (PPE), hospital and intensive care unit beds, and ventilators should be considered, even in areas that are not currently dealing with COVID-19 infections. While case-by-case evaluations will be
made by clinicians, the following factors are to be considered as to whether planned surgery should proceed:

• Current and projected COVID-19 cases in the facility and region

• Supply of PPE to the facilities in the system

• Staffing availability

• Bed availability, especially intensive care unit (ICU) beds

• Ventilator availability

• Health and age of the patient, especially given the risks of concurrent COVID-19 infection during recovery

• Urgency of the procedure

This Addendum to the Executive Order shall take effect upon signing and shall continue in full force and effect until April 15, 2020, at which time the Governor, in consultation with the Vermont Department of Health and Agency of Human Services, the Department
of Public Safety/Division of Emergency Management shall assess the emergency and determine whether to amend or extend this Order as it relates to the suspension of adult elective surgery and medical and surgical procedures,
including all dental procedures.

Dated March 20, 2020

AMENDMENT TO ADDENDUM 3 TO EXECUTIVE ORDER 01-20

WHEREAS, on Friday, March 13, 2020, the Governor issued Executive Order 01-20, Declaration of State of Emergency in Response to COVID-19 and National Guard Call-Out (“Executive Order”), declaring a state of emergency for the State of Vermont in response
to COVID-19; and

WHEREAS, the Executive Order expressly recognized the critical need to take steps to control outbreaks of COVID-19, particularly among those who are elderly or already have underlying chronic health conditions, to minimize the risk to the public, maintain
the health and safety of Vermonters, and limit the spread of infection in our communities and within our healthcare facilities; and

WHEREAS, in consultation with the Commissioner of the Department of Health, the Governor has directed a number of mitigation strategies for the State in order to protect individuals at risk for severe illness; and

WHEREAS, to aggressively address COVID-19, conservation of critical resources such as ventilators and Personal Protective Equipment (PPE) is essential, as well as limiting exposure of patients and staff to COVID-19; and

WHEREAS, after receiving updated recommendations from the U.S. Surgeon General and the U.S. College of Surgeons, the Centers for Medicare & Medicaid, and in consultation with the Commissioner of the Department of Health and the Vermont Association
of Hospitals and Health Systems, the Governor determined it was necessary to suspend all non-essential adult elective surgery and medical and surgical procedures, including dental procedures, pursuant to Addendum 3 to the Executive
Order as of March 20, 2020, in order to help protect patients, reduce exposure to healthcare providers and preserve PPE; and

WHEREAS, the Governor, in consultation with the Commissioner of the Department of Health and representatives of Vermont healthcare providers, has determined a limited resumption of outpatient services, including clinic visits, diagnostic imaging and limited
outpatient surgeries and procedures is appropriate at this time.

NOW THEREFORE, I, Philip B. Scott, by virtue of the authority vested in me as Governor of Vermont by the Constitution of the State of Vermont, the emergency powers set forth in 20 V.S.A. §§ 8, 9 and 11 and other laws, hereby authorize the Commissioner
of the Vermont Department of Public Health to issue mitigation requirements and procedures for the resumption of clinic visits, diagnostic imaging and such outpatient surgeries and procedures that have a minimal impact on inpatient
hospital bed capacity and PPE levels, including those performed in the office or ambulatory surgical care setting.

The Commissioner of the Department of Public Health, with the approval of the Governor, may, from time-to-time, update and modify the mitigation requirements and procedures regarding the resumption of additional adult elective surgery and medical and
surgical procedures, including dental procedures.

If the Commissioner of the Vermont Department of Health has determined that a COVID-19 outbreak has occurred and providers cannot safely care for Vermonters in a way that (1) limits the exposure of patients and staff to COVID-19; (2) preserves PPE and
ventilators; and (3) preserves inpatient hospital capacity, it will notify and require all providers in the region to return to the standards set out in Addendum 3 to the Executive Order. Depending on the severity of the outbreak,
the Vermont Department of Health may require all Vermont providers to return to those standards.

This Amendment to Addendum 3 to the Executive Order shall take effect upon signing and, except as amended hereby, Addendum 3 to the Executive Order, shall continue in full force and effect until midnight on May 15, 2020, at which time the Governor, in
consultation with the Vermont Department of Health and the Department of Public Safety/Division of Emergency Management shall assess the emergency and determine whether to amend or extend Addendum 3, as amended.

Dated May 4, 2020

ADDENDUM 4 TO EXECUTIVE ORDER 01-20

Closure of Close-Contact Businesses and Further Restrictions of the Size of Mass Gatherings

WHEREAS, on Friday, March 13, 2020, the Governor issued Executive Order 01-20, Declaration of State of Emergency in Response to COVID-19 and National Guard Call-Out (“Executive Order”), declaring a state of emergency for the State of Vermont in response
to COVID-19; and

WHEREAS, since that time, the number of cases of COVID-19 which have been tested as presumptively positive in the State has grown exponentially; and

WHEREAS, the Executive Order expressly recognized the critical need to take steps to control outbreaks of COVID-19, particularly among those who are elderly or already have underlying chronic health conditions, to minimize the risk to the public, maintain
the health and safety of Vermonters, and limit the spread of infection in our communities and within our healthcare facilities; and

WHEREAS, in consultation with the Commissioner of the Department of Health, the Governor has directed a number of mitigation strategies for the State in order to reduce close contact among individuals, including the temporary closure of bars and restaurants,
schools and daycare facilities other than those providing childcare services as needed for the children of essential personnel and DMV district offices; limiting the size of mass gatherings; and postponing all non-essential
medical procedures; and

WHEREAS, in consultation with the Commissioner of the Department of Health, the Governor has determined it is necessary to cease all in-person operations of businesses which, by the very nature of their business, are unable to comply with Centers for
Disease Control (CDC) guidelines regarding social distancing; and

WHEREAS, in consultation with the Commissioner of the Department of Health, the Governor has determined it is necessary to further reduce the size of mass gatherings; and

WHEREAS, it is important for all Vermonters to recognize additional reductions or prohibitions may be implemented as needed to the extent there is a growing trend of confirmed COVID-19 in Vermont.

NOW THEREFORE, I, Philip B. Scott, by virtue of the authority vested in me as Governor of Vermont by the Constitution of the State of Vermont, the emergency powers set forth in 20 V.S.A. §§ 8, 9 and 11 and other laws, hereby order as follows:

1.
No later than 8:00 p.m. on Monday, March 23, 2020, gymnasiums, fitness centers and similar exercise facilities, hair salons and barbers, nail salons, spas and tattoo parlors shall cease all in-person operations.

2.
For the avoidance of doubt, at this time, subject to closures and limitations provided in prior orders, all other businesses may remain open, but must, to the extent practicable, implement CDC guidance to ensure
social distancing, including:

• maintaining a distance of 6 feet between person;

• ensuring employees practice appropriate hygiene measures, including regular, thorough handwashing;

• ensuring that employees who are sick remain home; and

• regularly cleaning and disinfecting frequently touched objects and surfaces.

3
I hereby further amend and restate Section 6 of the Executive Order to prohibit all non-essential gatherings of more than ten (10) people at the same time in a space such as an auditorium, stadium, arena, large
conference room, meeting hall, theater or any other confined indoor or confined outdoor space which encourages congregation.

4.
All public and private enterprises shall post appropriate notices requiring compliance with recommendations by the CDC and the Commissioner of the Vermont Department of Health including, at a minimum, those set
forth above in Section 2.

This Addendum to the Executive Order shall take effect upon signing and shall continue in full force and effect until April 15, 2020, at which time the Governor, in consultation with the Vermont Department of Health and Agency of Human Services, the Department
of Public Safety/Division of Emergency Management shall assess the emergency and determine whether to amend or extend this Order.

Dated March 20, 2020

ADDENDUM 5 TO EXECUTIVE ORDER 01-20

Order to Work From Home for all Businesses and Non-Profits

WHEREAS, on Friday, March 13, 2020, the Governor issued Executive Order 01-20, Declaration of State of Emergency in Response to COVID-19 and National Guard Call-Out (“Executive Order”), declaring a state of emergency for the State of Vermont in response
to COVID-19; and

WHEREAS, since that time, the number of cases of COVID-19 which have been tested as presumptively positive in the State has grown exponentially; and

WHEREAS, the Executive Order expressly recognized the critical need to take steps to control outbreaks of COVID-19, particularly among those who are elderly or already have underlying chronic health conditions, to minimize the risk to the public, maintain
the health and safety of Vermonters, and limit the spread of infection in our communities and within our healthcare facilities; and

WHEREAS, in consultation with the Commissioner of the Department of Health, the Governor has directed a number of mitigation strategies for the State in order to reduce close contact among individuals, including the closure of bars and restaurants, schools
and day care centers and close contact businesses, limiting the size of mass gatherings and postponing all non-essential medical procedures; and

WHEREAS, in consultation with the Commissioner of the Department of Health, the Governor has determined it is necessary to require all businesses and not-for-profit entities in the state to utilize telecommuting, to the maximum extent possible; and

WHEREAS, it is important for all Vermonters to recognize additional reductions or prohibitions may be implemented as needed to the extent there is a growing trend of confirmed COVID-19 in Vermont.

NOW THEREFORE, I, Philip B. Scott, by virtue of the authority vested in me as Governor of Vermont by the Constitution of the State of Vermont, the emergency powers set forth in 20 V.S.A. §§ 8, 9 and 11 and other laws, hereby order, effective on Monday,
March 23, 2020 at 8:00 p.m., all businesses and not-for-profit entities in the state to put into place, to the maximum extent possible, telecommuting or work from home procedures.

This Addendum to the Executive Order shall take effect upon signing and shall continue in full force and effect until April 15, 2020, at which time the Governor, in consultation with the Vermont Department of Health and Agency of Human Services, the Department
of Public Safety/Division of Emergency Management shall assess the emergency and determine whether to amend or extend this Order.

Dated: March 23, 2020

ADDENDUM 6 TO EXECUTIVE ORDER 01-20

[Stay Home/Stay Safe]

WHEREAS, on Friday, March 13, 2020, the Governor issued Executive Order 01-20, Declaration of State of Emergency in Response to COVID-19 and National Guard Call-Out (“Executive Order”), declaring a state of emergency for the State of Vermont in response
to COVID-19; and

WHEREAS, since that time, the number of cases of COVID-19 which have been tested as presumptively positive in the State has grown exponentially and unfortunately the State has seen its first deaths from this disease; and

WHEREAS, the Executive Order expressly recognized the critical need to take steps to control outbreaks of COVID-19, particularly among those who are elderly or already have underlying chronic health conditions, to minimize the risk to the public, maintain
the health and safety of Vermonters, and limit the spread of infection in our communities and within our healthcare facilities; and

WHEREAS, VDH is urging all residents of the State to limit normal everyday activities outside of the home and to practice social distancing at all times to limit the spread of this highly contagious and potentially deadly virus; and

WHEREAS, consistent with Centers for Disease Control (CDC) guidelines regarding social distancing, and in consultation with the Commissioner of the Department of Health (VDH), the Governor has directed a number of mitigation strategies for the State in
order to reduce close contact among individuals, including the closure of bars and restaurants, schools and day care centers and close contact businesses; limiting the size of mass gatherings; postponing all non-essential medical
procedures; and ordering all businesses to implement telecommuting where possible; and

WHEREAS, the Governor understands most Vermonters, Vermont communities and Vermont businesses recognize the potentially disastrous effects of COVID-19 if we were to continue business as usual, and have taken responsible, common sense, and creative measures
to conduct our businesses and our lives in a manner consistent with CDC and Vermont Department of Health social distancing guidelines; and

WHEREAS, nonetheless, further measures are needed to reduce the spread of COVID-19 to, avoid needless illness and deaths while ensuring the continuity of functions critical to public health and safety and our economic and national security.

NOW THEREFORE, in order to restrict and minimize all unnecessary activities outside of the home or place of residence during the state of emergency, I, Philip B. Scott, by virtue of the authority vested in me as Governor of Vermont by the Constitution
of the State of Vermont, the emergency powers set forth in 20 V.S.A. §§ 8, 9 and 11 and other laws, hereby order the following:

1.
To preserve the public health and safety, to ensure the healthcare delivery system is capable of serving all, and to help protect those at the highest risk and vulnerability, Vermonters are directed to stay at
home or in their place of residence, leaving only for essential reasons such as: personal safety; groceries or medicine; curbside pick-up of goods, meals or beverages; medical care; exercise; care of others; and work, as set
forth further below. Vermonters shall significantly restrict normal activities outside the home or place of residence, consistent with CDC guidance, to help stop the spread of the virus.

2.
As previously directed, all workers shall work remotely when possible.

3.
Except as set forth below, effective Wednesday, March 25, 2020 at 5 p.m., subject to closures and limitations provided in prior orders, all businesses and not-for-profit entities in the state shall suspend in-person
business operations. These businesses and not-for-profit entities are encouraged to develop business strategies, procedures and practices such as using an on-line presence, telephone and web-based service delivery and phone
or on-line orders for curb-side pick-up and delivery.

The Vermont Agency of Commerce and Community Development (ACCD), shall develop a process for responding to questions regarding acceptable continuation of business operations.

4.
All businesses, governmental entities and not-for-profit entities shall develop strategies, procedures and practices designed for strict adherence to CDC and VDH guidance to ensure recommended social distancing,
including, to the extent possible:

a.
maintaining a distance of 6 feet between persons;

b.
requiring employees to practice appropriate hygiene measures, including regular, thorough handwashing;

c.
requiring employees who are sick remain home; and

d.
regularly cleaning and disinfecting frequently touched objects and surfaces.

5.
Businesses and entities providing services or functions deemed critical to public health and safety, as well as economic and national security shall remain in operation, and, except as set forth in Section 4 above,
shall not be subject to the in-person restrictions set forth in Section 3.

6.
Services or functions in Vermont deemed critical to public health and safety, as well as economic and national security include:

a.
health care operations such as COVID-19 testing and clinical research, hospital personnel and other healthcare providers, public health workers and other healthcare service providers, laboratory services, caregivers,
logistics, technology, security and custodial support, blood and plasma donors and mortuary services;

b.
law enforcement, public safety and first responders, including fire, ambulance services, emergency medical technicians and emergency management personnel;

c.
critical infrastructure including utilities, telecommunication, airports and transportation infrastructure;

d.
construction necessary to support the COVID-19 response and maintain critical infrastructure;

e.
critical manufacturing, including food and animal feed manufacturing, processing and supply, pharmaceuticals and other manufacturing necessary to support the COVID-19 response as well as economic and national security;

f.
retail serving basic human needs such as grocery stores, pharmacies, other retail that sells food, beverage, animal feed and essential supplies, provided, these retail operations shall be conducted through on-line
and telephone orders for delivery and curb-side pickup to the extent possible;

g.
fuel products and supply;

h.
hardware stores, provided, these retail operations shall be conducted through on-line and telephone orders for delivery and curb-side pickup to the extent possible;

i.
transportation sector and agricultural sector equipment parts, repair and maintenance, provided these retail operations shall be conducted through on-line and telephone orders for delivery and curb-side pickup
to the extent possible;

j.
trash collection and disposal, recycling and operations and maintenance of drinking water and wastewater/drainage infrastructure;

k.
agriculture and farms, animal shelters, production and delivery of seed, chemicals and fertilizers, CSAs and veterinarians;

l.
lodging, to the extent required to support COVID-19 response, critical infrastructure and national security;

m.
other building and property services for the safety, sanitation and operations of residences or other businesses;

n
mail and shipping services;

o
news media;

p.
banks and related financial institutions, provided, however, routine retail banking operations shall be limited to transactions conducted through automated teller machines, drive-through services and online and
telephone services;

q.
providers of necessities and services to economically disadvantaged populations; and

r.
other vendors of technical, security, logistics, custodial and equipment repair and maintenance services necessary to support the COVID-19 response, critical infrastructure and national security.

7.